Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2760YC (3) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.34, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. Notwithstanding paragraph âaâ , if 3 the department issues registration plates or reassigns the 4 registration plates previously issued to a vehicle designated 5 by a registrant as a vehicle in a fleet, as defined in section 6 326.3, the department shall not issue a validation sticker and 7 the registrant is not required to display a validation sticker 8 on a registration plate. The department may adopt rules 9 pursuant to chapter 17A providing for other means to identify 10 motor vehicles registered as described in section 326.6. 11